Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB85.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.505 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 16.505 to 16.652, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "System" means the State Police Retirement System created by KRS 16.505 to 16.652;
(2) "Board" means the board of trustees of the Kentucky Retirement Systems;
(3) "Employer" or "State Police" means the Department of Kentucky State Police, or its successor;
(4) "Current service" means the number of years and completed months of employment as an employee
subsequent to July 1, 1958, for which creditable compensation was paid by the employer and employee
contributions deducted except as otherwise provided;
(5) "Prior service" means the number of years and completed months of employment as an employee prior to July
1, 1958, for which creditable compensation was paid to the employee by the Commonwealth. Twelve (12)
months of current service in the system are required to validate prior service;
(6) "Service" means the total of current service and prior service;
(7) "Accumulated contributions" at any time means the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a
member and credited to his or her individual account in the member's account, including employee
contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 16.545(4), together with interest credited on
such amounts as provided in KRS 16.505 to 16.652, and any other amounts the member shall have
contributed, including interest credited. For members who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008,
"accumulated contributions" shall not include employee contributions that are deposited into accounts
established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the funds established in KRS 16.510 and 61.515, as
prescribed by KRS 61.702(3)(b);
(8) "Creditable compensation":
(a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, means all salary and wages, including
payments for compensatory time, paid to the employee as a result of services performed for the
employer or for time during which the member is on paid leave, which are includable on the member's
federal form W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips, other compensation,"
including employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 16.545(4);
(b) Includes:
1. Lump-sum bonuses, severance pay, or employer-provided payments for purchase of service
credit, which shall be averaged over the employee's total service with the system in which it is
recorded if it is equal to or greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
2. Lump-sum payments for creditable compensation paid as a result of an order of a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or
for any creditable compensation paid in anticipation of settlement of an action before a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights,
including notices of violations of state or federal wage and hour statutes or violations of state or
federal discrimination statutes, which shall be credited to the fiscal year during which the wages
were earned or should have been paid by the employer. This subparagraph shall also include
lump-sum payments for reinstated wages pursuant to KRS 61.569, which shall be credited to the
period during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer;
3. Amounts which are not includable in the member's gross income by virtue of the member having
taken a voluntary salary reduction provided for under applicable provisions of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. Elective amounts for qualified transportation fringes paid or made available on or after January
1, 2001, for calendar years on or after January 1, 2001, that are not includable in the gross
income of the employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. sec. 132(f)(4); and
(c) Excludes:
1. Living allowances, expense reimbursements, lump-sum payments for accrued vacation leave,
and other items determined by the board;
2. For employees who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008, lump-sum payments for
compensatory time; and
3. Any salary or wages paid to an employee for services as a Kentucky State Police school resource
officer as defined by KRS 158.441;
(9) "Final compensation" means:
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, the creditable compensation of a
member during the three (3) fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided
by the number of months of service credit during the three (3) year period, multiplied by twelve (12);
the three (3) years may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number of months of service
credit during the three (3) year period is less than twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal
years shall be used; or
(b) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, the
creditable compensation of the member during the three (3) complete fiscal years he or she was paid at
the highest average monthly rate divided by three (3). Each fiscal year used to determine final
compensation must contain twelve (12) months of service credit. If the member does not have three (3)
complete fiscal years that each contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more
additional fiscal years, which may contain less than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be added
until the number of months in the final compensation calculation is at least thirty-six (36) months;
(10) "Final rate of pay" means the actual rate upon which earnings of a member were calculated during the twelve
(12) month period immediately preceding the member's effective retirement date, including employee
contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 16.545(4). The rate shall be certified to the
system by the employer and the following equivalents shall be used to convert the rate to an annual rate: two
thousand eighty (2,080) hours for eight (8) hour workdays, one thousand nine hundred fifty (1,950) hours for
seven and one-half (7-1/2) hour workdays, two hundred sixty (260) days, fifty-two (52) weeks, twelve (12)
months, or one (1) year;
(11) "Retired member" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance or any former member who has
filed the necessary documents for retirement benefits and is no longer contributing to the retirement system;
(12) "Retirement allowance" means the retirement payments to which a retired member is entitled;
(13) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of actuarial tables
adopted by the board. In cases of disability retirement, the options authorized by KRS 61.635 shall be
computed by adding ten (10) years to the age of the member, unless the member has chosen the Social
Security adjustment option as provided for in KRS 61.635(8), in which case the member's actual age shall be
used. For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, no disability retirement
option shall be less than the same option computed under early retirement;
(14) "Authorized leave of absence" means any time during which a person is absent from employment but retained
in the status of an employee in accordance with the personnel policy of the Department of Kentucky State
Police;
(15) "Normal retirement date" means:
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following
a member's fifty-fifth birthday, except that for members over age fifty-five (55) on July 1, 1958, it shall
mean January 1, 1959; or
(b) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, the first day of the month
following a member's sixtieth birthday;
(16) "Disability retirement date" means the first day of the month following the last day of paid employment;

CHAPTER 18 3
(17) "Dependent child" means a child in the womb and a natural or legally adopted child of the member who has
neither attained age eighteen (18) nor married or who is an unmarried full-time student who has not attained
age twenty-two (22). Solely in the cases where a member dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as
defined in this section, dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, becomes totally and
permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this section, or becomes disabled
as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS
61.621(5)(a), "dependent child" also means a naturally or legally adopted disabled child of the member,
regardless of the child's age, if the child has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security
disability benefits or is being claimed as a qualifying child for tax purposes due to the child's total and
permanent disability;
(18) "Optional allowance" means an actuarially equivalent benefit elected by the member in lieu of all other
benefits provided by KRS 16.505 to 16.652;
(19) "Act in line of duty" means:
(a) A single act occurring or a single thing done, which, as determined by the board, was required in the
performance of the duties specified in KRS 16.060;
(b) For employees in hazardous positions under KRS 61.592, a single act occurring which was required in
the performance of the principal duties of the position as defined by the job description; or
(c) For employees participating in the State Police Retirement System and for employees who are in
hazardous positions under KRS 61.592, a single act of violence committed against the employee that is
found to be related to his or her job duties, whether or not it occurs at his or her job site;
(20) "Early retirement date" means:
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, the retirement date declared by a
member who is not less than fifty (50) years of age and has fifteen (15) years of service; or
(b) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, the
retirement date declared by a member who is not less than fifty (50) years of age and has fifteen (15)
years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1) or 61.543(1) or another state-administered retirement
system;
(21) "Member" means any officer included in the membership of the system as provided under KRS 16.520 whose
membership has not been terminated under KRS 61.535;
(22) "Regular full-time officers" means the occupants of positions as set forth in KRS 16.010;
(23) "Hazardous disability" as used in KRS 16.505 to 16.652 means a disability which results in an employee's total
incapacity to continue as an employee in a hazardous position, but the employee is not necessarily deemed to
be totally and permanently disabled to engage in other occupations for remuneration or profit;
(24) "Current rate of pay" means the member's actual hourly, daily, weekly, biweekly, monthly, or yearly rate of
pay converted to an annual rate as defined in final rate of pay. The rate shall be certified by the employer;
(25) "Beneficiary" means the person, persons, estate, trust, special needs trust, or trustee designated by the member
in accordance with KRS 61.542 or 61.705 to receive any available benefits in the event of the member's death.
As used in KRS 61.702, "beneficiary" does not mean an estate, trust, or trustee;
(26) "Recipient" means the retired member, the person or persons designated as beneficiary by the member and
drawing a retirement allowance as a result of the member's death, or a dependent child drawing a retirement
allowance. An alternate payee of a qualified domestic relations order shall not be considered a recipient,
except for purposes of KRS 61.623;
(27) "Person" means a natural person;
(28) "Retirement office" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority office building in Frankfort, unless
otherwise designated by the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority;
(29) "Vested" for purposes of determining eligibility for purchasing service credit under KRS 61.552 means the
employee has at least forty-eight (48) months of service if age sixty-five (65) or older or at least sixty (60)
months of service if under the age of sixty-five (65). For purposes of this subsection, "service" means service
in the systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems and County Employees Retirement Systems;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(30) "Last day of paid employment" means the last date employer and employee contributions are required to be
reported in accordance with KRS 16.543 or 61.543 to the retirement office in order for the employee to receive
current service credit for the month. Last day of paid employment does not mean a date the employee receives
payment for accrued leave, whether by lump sum or otherwise, if that date occurs twenty-four (24) or more
months after previous contributions;
(31) "Objective medical evidence" means reports of examinations or treatments; medical signs which are
anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that can be observed; psychiatric signs which are
medically demonstrable phenomena indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory,
orientation, or contact with reality; or laboratory findings which are anatomical, physiological, or
psychological phenomena that can be shown by medically acceptable laboratory diagnostic techniques,
including but not limited to chemical tests, electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and
psychological tests;
(32) "Fiscal year" of the system means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the following June 30, which
shall also be the plan year. The "fiscal year" shall be the limitation year used to determine contribution and
benefit limits established by 26 U.S.C. sec. 415;
(33) "Participating" means an employee is currently earning service credit in the system as provided in KRS
16.543;
(34) "Month" means a calendar month;
(35) "Membership date" means the date upon which the member began participating in the system as provided by
KRS 16.543;
(36) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (21) of this section, or a retired member, as defined
by subsection (11) of this section;
(37) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property
settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital property rights to an alternate
payee;
(38) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant, who is designated
to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic relations order;
(39) "Accumulated employer credit" means the employer pay credit deposited to the member's account and interest
credited on such amounts as provided by KRS 16.583;
(40) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, the member's accumulated
contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid cash
balance plan as provided by KRS 16.583, the combined sum of the member's accumulated contributions
and the member's accumulated employer pay credit;[ and]
(41) "Monthly average pay" means:
(a) In the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this section or
who dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, the higher of the member's
monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the deceased
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment; or
(b) In the case where a member becomes totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in line
of duty as defined in this section or becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in
KRS 61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the higher of the member's
monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the disabled
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment prior to the date the act in line of duty
or duty-related injury occurred; and
(42) "Special needs trust" means a trust described in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A) or (C) for the benefit of one
(1) person. Any reference to a trust includes a special needs trust, unless the context otherwise requires.

CHAPTER 18 5
Section 2. KRS 16.578 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a member dies prior to the first day of the month in which the member would have received his or her first
retirement allowance, the member's beneficiary shall be eligible for the benefits provided by this section if the
member had on file a written designation of a beneficiary with the retirement office as provided by KRS
61.542 and the member met the following conditions at the date of his or her death:
(a) The member was eligible to retire under KRS 16.576, 16.577, or 16.583(6);
(b) The member was in active employment or on authorized leave of absence with five (5) or more years of
service credit and died prior to his or her normal retirement date; or
(c) The member was not in active employment or on authorized leave of absence with twelve (12) or more
years of service credit and died prior to his or her normal retirement date.
(2) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section is a single person or a
special needs trust, then the beneficiary may elect to receive:
(a) A monthly benefit payable for the life of the beneficiary or the life of the beneficiary of a special needs
trust that is equal to the benefit that would have been paid had the member retired immediately prior to
his or her date of death and elected to receive benefits payable under the survivorship one hundred
percent (100%) option as provided in KRS 61.635(2);
(b) A monthly benefit payable for the life of the beneficiary or the life of the beneficiary of a special needs
trust under the beneficiary Social Security adjustment option as provided in KRS 61.635(9) that is the
actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) A monthly benefit payable for a period of sixty (60) months that is the actuarial equivalent to the
amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(d) A monthly benefit payable for a period of one hundred twenty (120) months that is the actuarial
equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(e) If the member began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, a monthly benefit payable for:
1. Sixty (60) months certain;
2. One hundred twenty (120) months certain;
3. The actuarial equivalent refund; or
4. The Social Security adjustment option;
that is equivalent to the benefit the member would have been entitled to receive based on his or her
years of service and final compensation at the date of his or her death reduced by the survivorship fifty
percent (50%) factor as provided for in KRS 61.635(4), then reduced by fifty percent (50%), and that is
the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
(f) The higher of a refund of the member's accumulated account balance and interest as described in KRS
61.625(1) or a one (1) time lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the amount
payable under paragraph (a) of this subsection for a period of sixty (60) months.
(3) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section are multiple beneficiaries or
a trust, other than a special needs trust, then the multiple beneficiaries by consensus or the trustee may elect
to receive the actuarial equivalent amounts payable under subsection (2)(c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section using
the assumption that the beneficiary's age is the same as the member's age.
(4) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section is the member's estate, then
the beneficiary shall receive the higher of a refund of the member's accumulated account balance and interest
as described in KRS 61.625(1) or the one (1) time lump-sum payment payable under subsection (2)(f) of this
section, using the assumption that the beneficiary's age is the same as the member's age.
(5) Payments of taxable distributions made pursuant to this section shall be subject to state and federal tax as
appropriate.
Section 3. KRS 61.510 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 61.510 to 61.705, unless the context otherwise requires:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) "System" means the Kentucky Employees Retirement System created by KRS 61.510 to 61.705;
(2) "Board" means the board of trustees of the system as provided in KRS 61.645;
(3) "Department" means any state department or board or agency participating in the system in accordance with
appropriate executive order, as provided in KRS 61.520. For purposes of KRS 61.510 to 61.705, the members,
officers, and employees of the General Assembly and any other body, entity, or instrumentality designated by
executive order by the Governor, shall be deemed to be a department, notwithstanding whether said body,
entity, or instrumentality is an integral part of state government;
(4) "Examiner" means the medical examiners as provided in KRS 61.665;
(5) "Employee" means the members, officers, and employees of the General Assembly and every regular full-
time, appointed or elective officer or employee of a participating department, including the Department of
Military Affairs. The term does not include persons engaged as independent contractors, seasonal, emergency,
temporary, interim, and part-time workers. In case of any doubt, the board shall determine if a person is an
employee within the meaning of KRS 61.510 to 61.705;
(6) "Employer" means a department or any authority of a department having the power to appoint or select an
employee in the department, including the Senate and the House of Representatives, or any other entity, the
employees of which are eligible for membership in the system pursuant to KRS 61.525;
(7) "State" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(8) "Member" means any employee who is included in the membership of the system or any former employee
whose membership has not been terminated under KRS 61.535;
(9) "Service" means the total of current service and prior service as defined in this section;
(10) "Current service" means the number of years and months of employment as an employee, on and after July 1,
1956, except that for members, officers, and employees of the General Assembly this date shall be January 1,
1960, for which creditable compensation is paid and employee contributions deducted, except as otherwise
provided, and each member, officer, and employee of the General Assembly shall be credited with a month of
current service for each month he or she serves in the position;
(11) "Prior service" means the number of years and completed months, expressed as a fraction of a year, of
employment as an employee, prior to July 1, 1956, for which creditable compensation was paid; except that for
members, officers, and employees of the General Assembly, this date shall be January 1, 1960. An employee
shall be credited with one (1) month of prior service only in those months he or she received compensation for
at least one hundred (100) hours of work; provided, however, that each member, officer, and employee of the
General Assembly shall be credited with a month of prior service for each month he or she served in the
position prior to January 1, 1960. Twelve (12) months of current service in the system are required to validate
prior service;
(12) "Accumulated contributions" at any time means the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a
member and credited to his or her individual account in the members' account, including employee
contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 61.560(4), together with interest credited, on
such amounts and any other amounts the member shall have contributed thereto, including interest credited
thereon. For members who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008, "accumulated contributions"
shall not include employee contributions that are deposited into accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
sec. 401(h) within the funds established in KRS 16.510 and 61.515, as prescribed by KRS 61.702(3)(b);
(13) "Creditable compensation":
(a) Means all salary, wages, tips to the extent the tips are reported for income tax purposes, and fees,
including payments for compensatory time, paid to the employee as a result of services performed for
the employer or for time during which the member is on paid leave, which are includable on the
member's federal form W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips, other
compensation," including employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS
61.560(4). For members of the General Assembly, it shall mean all amounts which are includable on the
member's federal form W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips, other
compensation," including employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS
6.505(4) or 61.560(4);
(b) Includes:

CHAPTER 18 7
1. Lump-sum bonuses, severance pay, or employer-provided payments for purchase of service
credit, which shall be averaged over the employee's total service with the system in which it is
recorded if it is equal to or greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
2. Cases where compensation includes maintenance and other perquisites, but the board shall fix
the value of that part of the compensation not paid in money;
3. Lump-sum payments for creditable compensation paid as a result of an order of a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or
for any creditable compensation paid in anticipation of settlement of an action before a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights,
including notices of violations of state or federal wage and hour statutes or violations of state or
federal discrimination statutes, which shall be credited to the fiscal year during which the wages
were earned or should have been paid by the employer. This subparagraph shall also include
lump-sum payments for reinstated wages pursuant to KRS 61.569, which shall be credited to the
period during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer;
4. Amounts which are not includable in the member's gross income by virtue of the member having
taken a voluntary salary reduction provided for under applicable provisions of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
5. Elective amounts for qualified transportation fringes paid or made available on or after January
1, 2001, for calendar years on or after January 1, 2001, that are not includable in the gross
income of the employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. sec. 132(f)(4); and
(c) Excludes:
1. Living allowances, expense reimbursements, lump-sum payments for accrued vacation leave,
and other items determined by the board;
2. For employees who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008, lump-sum payments for
compensatory time;
3. For employees who begin participating on or after August 1, 2016, nominal fees paid for services
as a volunteer; and
4. Any salary or wages paid to an employee for services as a Kentucky State Police school resource
officer as defined by KRS 158.441;
(14) "Final compensation" of a member means:
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is employed in a nonhazardous
position, the creditable compensation of the member during the five (5) fiscal years he or she was paid
at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit during that five
(5) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The five (5) years may be fractional and need not be
consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the five (5) year period is less than forty-
eight (48), one (1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(b) For a member who is employed in a nonhazardous position, whose effective retirement date is between
August 1, 2001, and January 1, 2009, and whose total service credit is at least twenty-seven (27) years
and whose age and years of service total at least seventy-five (75), final compensation means the
creditable compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years the member was paid at the
highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit during that three (3)
years period multiplied by twelve (12). The three (3) years may be fractional and need not be
consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3) year period is less than
twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used. Notwithstanding the provision of
KRS 61.565, the funding for this paragraph shall be provided from existing funds of the retirement
allowance;
(c) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is employed in a hazardous
position, as provided in KRS 61.592, the creditable compensation of the member during the three (3)
fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of
service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The three (3) years may be
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3)
year period is less than twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(d) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014,
who is employed in a nonhazardous position, the creditable compensation of the member during the
five (5) complete fiscal years immediately preceding retirement divided by five (5). Each fiscal year
used to determine final compensation must contain twelve (12) months of service credit. If the member
does not have five (5) complete fiscal years that each contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then
one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may contain less than twelve (12) months of service
credit, shall be added until the number of months in the final compensation calculation is at least sixty
(60) months; or
(e) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014,
who is employed in a hazardous position as provided in KRS 61.592, the creditable compensation of the
member during the three (3) complete fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly
rate divided by three (3). Each fiscal year used to determine final compensation must contain twelve
(12) months of service credit. If the member does not have three (3) complete fiscal years that each
contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may
contain less than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be added until the number of months in the
final compensation calculation is at least thirty-six (36) months;
(15) "Final rate of pay" means the actual rate upon which earnings of an employee were calculated during the
twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the member's effective retirement date, including employee
contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 61.560(4). The rate shall be certified to the
system by the employer and the following equivalents shall be used to convert the rate to an annual rate: two
thousand eighty (2,080) hours for eight (8) hour workdays, nineteen hundred fifty (1,950) hours for seven and
one-half (7-1/2) hour workdays, two hundred sixty (260) days, fifty-two (52) weeks, twelve (12) months, one
(1) year;
(16) "Retirement allowance" means the retirement payments to which a member is entitled;
(17) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of the actuarial tables
that are adopted by the board. In cases of disability retirement, the options authorized by KRS 61.635 shall be
computed by adding ten (10) years to the age of the member, unless the member has chosen the Social
Security adjustment option as provided for in KRS 61.635(8), in which case the member's actual age shall be
used. For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, no disability retirement
option shall be less than the same option computed under early retirement;
(18) "Normal retirement date" means the sixty-fifth birthday of a member, unless otherwise provided in KRS
61.510 to 61.705;
(19) "Fiscal year" of the system means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the following June 30, which
shall also be the plan year. The "fiscal year" shall be the limitation year used to determine contribution and
benefit limits as established by 26 U.S.C. sec. 415;
(20) "Officers and employees of the General Assembly" means the occupants of those positions enumerated in
KRS 6.150. The term shall also apply to assistants who were employed by the General Assembly for at least
one (1) regular legislative session prior to July 13, 2004, who elect to participate in the retirement system, and
who serve for at least six (6) regular legislative sessions. Assistants hired after July 13, 2004, shall be
designated as interim employees;
(21) "Regular full-time positions," as used in subsection (5) of this section, shall mean all positions that average
one hundred (100) or more hours per month determined by using the number of months actually worked
within a calendar or fiscal year, including all positions except:
(a) Seasonal positions, which although temporary in duration, are positions which coincide in duration with
a particular season or seasons of the year and which may recur regularly from year to year, the period of
time shall not exceed nine (9) months;
(b) Emergency positions which are positions utilized by the employer during:
1. An emergency as determined by the employer for a period not exceeding thirty (30) working
days and are nonrenewable; or

CHAPTER 18 9
2. A state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or the Governor of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky that are created or filled specifically for addressing the employer's
needs during and as a result of the declared emergency;
(c) Temporary positions which are positions of employment with a participating department for a period of
time not to exceed nine (9) months and are nonrenewable;
(d) Part-time positions which are positions which may be permanent in duration, but which require less
than a calendar or fiscal year average of one hundred (100) hours of work per month, determined by
using the number of months actually worked within a calendar or fiscal year, in the performance of
duty; and
(e) Interim positions which are positions established for a one-time or recurring need not to exceed nine (9)
months;
(22) "Vested" for purposes of determining eligibility for purchasing service credit under KRS 61.552 means the
employee has at least forty-eight (48) months of service if age sixty-five (65) or older or at least sixty (60)
months of service if under the age of sixty-five (65). For purposes of this subsection, "service" means service
in the systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems and County Employees Retirement System;
(23) "Parted employer" means a department, portion of a department, board, or agency, such as Outwood Hospital
and School, which previously participated in the system, but due to lease or other contractual arrangement is
now operated by a publicly held corporation or other similar organization, and therefore is no longer
participating in the system. The term "parted employer" shall not include a department, board, or agency that
ceased participation in the system pursuant to KRS 61.522;
(24) "Retired member" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance or any former member who has
filed the necessary documents for retirement benefits and is no longer contributing to the retirement system;
(25) "Current rate of pay" means the member's actual hourly, daily, weekly, biweekly, monthly, or yearly rate of
pay converted to an annual rate as defined in final rate of pay. The rate shall be certified by the employer;
(26) "Beneficiary" means the person or persons,[ or] estate,[ or] trust, special needs trust, or trustee designated by
the member in accordance with KRS 61.542 or 61.705 to receive any available benefits in the event of the
member's death. As used in KRS 61.702, "beneficiary" does not mean an estate, trust, or trustee;
(27) "Recipient" means the retired member or the person or persons designated as beneficiary by the member and
drawing a retirement allowance as a result of the member's death or a dependent child drawing a retirement
allowance. An alternate payee of a qualified domestic relations order shall not be considered a recipient,
except for purposes of KRS 61.623;
(28) "Level percentage of payroll amortization method" means a method of determining the annual amortization
payment on the unfunded actuarial accrued liability as expressed as a percentage of payroll over a set period of
years but that may be converted to a dollar value for purposes of KRS 61.565(1)(d). Under this method, the
percentage of payroll shall be projected to remain constant for all years remaining in the set period of time and
the unfunded actuarially accrued liability shall be projected to be fully amortized at the conclusion of the set
period of years;
(29) "Increment" means twelve (12) months of service credit which are purchased. The twelve (12) months need
not be consecutive. The final increment may be less than twelve (12) months;
(30) "Person" means a natural person;
(31) "Retirement office" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority's office building in Frankfort, unless
otherwise designated by the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority;
(32) "Last day of paid employment" means the last date employer and employee contributions are required to be
reported in accordance with KRS 16.543, 61.543, or 78.615 to the retirement office in order for the employee
to receive current service credit for the month. Last day of paid employment does not mean a date the
employee receives payment for accrued leave, whether by lump sum or otherwise, if that date occurs twenty-
four (24) or more months after previous contributions;
(33) "Objective medical evidence" means reports of examinations or treatments; medical signs which are
anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that can be observed; psychiatric signs which are
medically demonstrable phenomena indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
orientation, or contact with reality; or laboratory findings which are anatomical, physiological, or
psychological phenomena that can be shown by medically acceptable laboratory diagnostic techniques,
including but not limited to chemical tests, electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and
psychological tests;
(34) "Participating" means an employee is currently earning service credit in the system as provided in KRS
61.543;
(35) "Month" means a calendar month;
(36) "Membership date" means:
(a) The date upon which the member began participating in the system as provided in KRS 61.543;
(b) For a member electing to participate in the system pursuant to KRS 196.167(4) or 311A.022(2) who has
not previously participated in the system or the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, the date the
member began participating in a defined contribution plan that meets the requirements of 26 U.S.C. sec.
403(b);
(c) For members bound by an educational contract as a conditional employee to the state of Kentucky prior
to December 31, 2003, the date on which the educational contract became effective; or
(d) For a member participating in the system pursuant to KRS 31.045, the earlier of the date upon which
the member began participating in the system under paragraph (a) of this subsection or the date the
member began employment with the Louisville and Jefferson County Public Defender Corporation;
(37) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (8) of this section, or a retired member, as defined by
subsection (24) of this section;
(38) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property
settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital property rights to an alternate
payee;
(39) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant, who is designated
to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic relations order;
(40) "Accumulated employer credit" mean the employer pay credit deposited to the member's account and interest
credited on such amounts as provided by KRS 16.583 and 61.597;
(41) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, the member's accumulated
contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid cash
balance plan as provided by KRS 16.583 and 61.597, the combined sum of the member's accumulated
contributions and the member's accumulated employer credit;
(42) "Volunteer" means an individual who:
(a) Freely and without pressure or coercion performs hours of service for an employer participating in one
(1) of the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems without receipt of compensation for
services rendered, except for reimbursement of actual expenses, payment of a nominal fee to offset the
costs of performing the voluntary services, or both; and
(b) If a retired member, does not become an employee, leased employee, or independent contractor of the
employer for which he or she is performing volunteer services for a period of at least twelve (12)
months following the retired member's most recent retirement date;
(43) "Nominal fee" means compensation earned for services as a volunteer that does not exceed five hundred
dollars ($500) per month with each participating employer. Compensation earned for services as a volunteer
from more than one (1) participating employer during a month shall not be aggregated to determine whether
the compensation exceeds the five hundred dollars ($500) per month maximum provided by this subsection;

CHAPTER 18 11
(44) "Nonhazardous position" means a position that does not meet the requirements of KRS 61.592 or has not been
approved by the board as a hazardous position;
(45) "Monthly average pay" means:
(a) In the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or
who dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, the higher of the member's
monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the deceased
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment; or
(b) In the case where a member becomes totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in line
of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in
KRS 61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the higher of the member's
monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the disabled
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment prior to the date the act in line of duty
or duty-related injury occurred;
(46) "Authority" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority as provided by KRS 61.505;
(47) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority;
(48) "Instructional staff" means the employees of a state college or university participating under KRS 61.520 who
are:
(a) Faculty;
(b) Staff responsible for teaching; or
(c) Other individuals employed in an administrative position that is eligible for participation in the
Teachers' Insurance and Annuity Association (TIAA) of the Teachers' Retirement System;
(49) "Agency reporting official" means the person designated by the participating employer who shall be
responsible for forwarding all employer and employee contributions and a record of the contributions to the
System and for performing other administrative duties pursuant to KRS 61.510 to 61.705;[ and]
(50) "Gainful employment" means work in any capacity that is or may be performed with regularity and is or may
be usually done for pay, whether pay is received or not received, including seasonal, volunteer, part-time, and
on-call work; and
(51) "Special needs trust" means a trust described in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A) or (C) for the benefit of one
(1) person. Any reference to a trust includes a special needs trust, unless the context otherwise requires.
Section 4. KRS 61.635 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each member shall have the right to elect to have his or her retirement allowance payable under any one (1) of
the options set forth in this section in lieu of the retirement allowance otherwise payable to the member upon
retirement under any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, and 78.510 to 78.852. The
amount of any optional retirement allowance shall be actuarially equivalent to the amount of retirement
allowance otherwise payable to the member.
(2) Survivorship one hundred percent (100%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance
during his or her lifetime and have the retirement allowance continued after the member's death to his or her
beneficiary during the lifetime of the person.
(3) Survivorship sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%). The member may elect to receive a decreased
retirement allowance during his or her lifetime and have two-thirds (2/3) of the retirement allowance continue
after the member's death to his or her beneficiary during the lifetime of the person.
(4) Survivorship fifty percent (50%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during
his or her lifetime and have one-half (1/2) of the retirement allowance continued after the member's death to
his or her beneficiary during the lifetime of the person.
(5) Life with ten (10) years certain. The member less than age seventy-six (76) may elect to receive a monthly
retirement allowance during his or her lifetime which shall guarantee payments for one hundred twenty (120)
months. If the member dies before receiving payments for one hundred twenty (120) months, the member's
beneficiary shall receive the remaining payments monthly, for the duration of the one hundred twenty (120)
months' period. However, if the trust is designated as beneficiary, the trustee of the trust may elect to receive a
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent to the remaining payments, or the trustee may elect
to continue the remaining monthly payments to the trust of the member. If the estate is designated as
beneficiary, the estate shall receive a lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent to the
remaining payments.
(6) Life with fifteen (15) years certain. The member less than age sixty-eight (68) may elect to receive a monthly
retirement allowance during his or her lifetime which shall guarantee payments for one hundred eighty (180)
months. If the member dies before receiving payments for one hundred eighty (180) months, the member's
beneficiary shall receive the remaining payments monthly for the duration of the one hundred eighty (180)
months' period. However, if the trust is designated as beneficiary, the trustee of the trust may elect to receive a
lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent to the remaining payments, or the trustee may elect
to continue the remaining payments to the trust of the member. If the estate is designated as beneficiary, the
estate shall receive a lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent to the remaining payments.
(7) Life with twenty (20) years certain. The member less than age sixty-two (62) may elect to receive a monthly
retirement allowance during his or her lifetime which shall guarantee payments for two hundred forty (240)
months. If the member dies before receiving payments for two hundred forty (240) months, the member's
beneficiary shall receive the remaining payments for the duration of the two hundred forty (240) months
period. However, if the trust is beneficiary, the trustee of the trust may elect to receive a lump-sum payment
which shall be the actuarial equivalent to the remaining payments, or the trustee may elect to continue the
remaining payments to the trust of the member. If the estate is designated as beneficiary, the estate shall
receive a lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent to the remaining payments.
(8) Social Security adjustment options. These options shall be available to any member who has not attained age
sixty-two (62) as follows:
(a) No survivor rights. The member may elect to receive an increased retirement allowance from his or her
effective retirement date through the month he or she attains age sixty-two (62) at which time his or her
retirement allowance shall be decreased for the remainder of his or her lifetime;
(b) Survivor rights. The member may elect to receive an increased retirement allowance from his or her
effective retirement date through the month he or she attains age sixty-two (62) based on the option
payable under subsection (2) of this section, if the retirement allowance shall be decreased in the month
following the month he or she attains age sixty-two (62), or the month following the month he or she
would have attained age sixty-two (62), in event of the member's death, and have the retirement
allowance continue after the member's death to his or her beneficiary during the lifetime of the person.
(9) Beneficiary Social Security adjustment option. This option is available to the beneficiary of a deceased
member if the beneficiary, who is a person, has not attained age sixty (60), and is eligible to receive Social
Security payments at age sixty (60). The beneficiary may elect to receive during his or her lifetime an
increased retirement allowance based on his or her annual benefit payable for life. The payment shall begin on
his or her effective retirement date and continue through the month he or she attains age sixty (60) at which
time his or her retirement allowance shall be decreased for the remainder of his or her lifetime.
(10) Pop-up option. The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during his or her lifetime
and have the retirement allowance continued after the member's death to his or her beneficiary during the
lifetime of the person. If the beneficiary dies prior to the member, or if the beneficiary is the member's spouse
and they divorce, the member's retirement allowance shall increase to the amount that would have been
payable as a single life annuity.
(11) Actuarial equivalent refund. A member who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, may
elect to receive a one (1) time lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the amount
payable for a period of sixty (60) months under KRS 61.595[ ](1).
(12) Partial lump-sum option.
(a) No survivor rights. A member may elect to receive a one-time lump-sum payment equal to twelve (12),
twenty-four (24), thirty-six (36), forty-eight (48), or sixty (60) monthly retirement allowances payable
under the applicable retirement formula for the system and receive a reduced monthly retirement
allowance payable for his or her lifetime. The lump-sum payment shall be paid in the month the first
monthly retirement allowance is payable.
(b) Survivor rights. A member may elect to receive a one-time lump-sum payment equal to twelve (12),
twenty-four (24), thirty-six (36), forty-eight (48), or sixty (60) monthly retirement allowances payable

CHAPTER 18 13
under subsection (2) of this section and receive a reduced monthly retirement allowance payable for his
or her lifetime. The lump-sum payment shall be paid in the month the first monthly retirement
allowance is payable. The reduced retirement allowance shall be continued after the member's death to
his or her beneficiary during the lifetime of the person.
(c) In order to explain the partial lump-sum option to members, the Authority shall:
1. Provide, for all retirement estimates that include the partial lump-sum option, including estimates
calculated by a member using an automatic estimator available on the Authority's website, the
additional months of service a member would have to be employed in order to recoup the
actuarial reduction in his or her monthly retirement allowance from selecting a partial lump-sum
option at each payment level; and
2. Prepare and make available to all members and participating employers in the form of a paper or
electronic pamphlet or booklet a summary of the partial lump-sum option, written in a manner
that can be understood by the average member and sufficiently accurate and comprehensive to
reasonably apprise them of the benefits and potential consequences, including federal tax
consequences, of taking a partial lump-sum option.
(13) The other provisions of this section notwithstanding, the beneficiary of a retired member of the General
Assembly shall, after the member's death, receive sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the member's
retirement allowance during his or her lifetime if the member of the General Assembly began participating in
the system prior to January 1, 2014, and has elected this option and has made contributions in accordance with
subsection (14) of this section and of KRS 61.560. The retirement allowance of the retired member of the
General Assembly shall not be actuarially reduced to provide for this survivor benefit.
(14) A member of the General Assembly who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, who
wishes to obtain the survivorship option specified in subsection (13) of this section shall so notify the
Kentucky Public Pensions Authority:
(a) Within thirty (30) days after first becoming a member of the General Assembly if he or she is not a
member of the General Assembly on July 15, 1980; or
(b) Within thirty (30) days after July 15, 1980, if he or she is a member of the General Assembly on July
15, 1980.
(15) The system shall forward to members of the General Assembly a form on which a member who began
participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, may elect the option provided for in subsections (13) and
(14) of this section.
(16) (a) The options described in subsections (2), (3), (4), (8)(b), (10), (12)(b), and (13) of this section shall be
extended to the member only if the designated beneficiary is a person or a special needs trust.
(b) If the beneficiary is a special needs trust, the following shall apply:
1. The age of the beneficiary of the special needs trust shall be used to determine the relevant
actuarial factors;
2. Upon the death of the retired member or beneficiary, the trustee of that trust shall notify the
Authority of the death of the retired member or beneficiary;
3. Any retirement allowance payments made to a special needs trust that are not properly payable
to the special needs trust shall be returned to the Authority and shall not be subject to claims
for reimbursement from any state for Medicaid benefits paid on behalf of the beneficiary of
the special needs trust under any Medicaid payback provision; and
4. The Authority may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to administer this subsection.
Section 5. KRS 61.640 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a member dies prior to the first day of the month in which the member would have received his or her first
retirement allowance, the member's beneficiary shall be eligible for the benefits provided by this section if the
member had on file a written designation of a beneficiary with the retirement office as provided by KRS
61.542 and the member met the following conditions at the date of his or her death:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) The member was eligible to retire under KRS 61.559(2) or (3), 61.5956(5)(a) or (b), or 61.597(6)(a) or
(b);
(b) The member was in active employment or on authorized leave of absence with five (5) or more years of
service credit and died prior to his or her normal retirement date or was normal retirement age or older
and had at least four (4) years of service credit; or
(c) The member was not in active employment or on authorized leave of absence with twelve (12) or more
years of service credit and died prior to his or her normal retirement date.
(2) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section is a single person or is a
special needs trust, then the beneficiary may elect to receive:
(a) A monthly benefit payable for the life of the beneficiary or the life of the beneficiary of the special
needs trust that is equal to the benefit that would have been paid had the member retired immediately
prior to his or her date of death and elected to receive benefits payable under the survivorship one
hundred percent (100%) option as provided in KRS 61.635(2);
(b) A monthly benefit payable for the life of the beneficiary or the life of the beneficiary of the special
needs trust under the beneficiary Social Security adjustment option as provided in KRS 61.635(9) that
is the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) A monthly benefit payable for a period of sixty (60) months that is the actuarial equivalent to the
amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(d) A monthly benefit payable for a period of one hundred twenty (120) months that is the actuarial
equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(e) If the member began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, a monthly benefit payable for:
1. Sixty (60) months certain;
2. One hundred twenty (120) months certain;
3. The actuarial equivalent refund; or
4. The Social Security adjustment option;
that is equivalent to the benefit the member would have been entitled to receive based on his or her
years of service and final compensation at the date of his or her death reduced by the survivorship fifty
percent (50%) factor as provided for in KRS 61.635(4), then reduced by fifty percent (50%), and that is
the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
(f) The higher of a refund of the member's accumulated account balance as described in KRS 61.625(1) or
one (1) time lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the amount payable under
paragraph (a) of this subsection for a period of sixty (60) months.
(3) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided by subsection (1) of this section are multiple beneficiaries or
a trust, other than a special needs trust, then the multiple beneficiaries by consensus or the trustee may elect
to receive the actuarial equivalent amounts payable under subsection (2)(c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section using
the assumption that the beneficiary's age is the same as the member's age.
(4) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section is the member's estate, then
the beneficiary shall receive the higher of a refund of the member's accumulated account balance as described
in KRS 61.625(1) or the one (1) time lump-sum payment payable under subsection (2)(f) of this section, using
the assumption that the beneficiary's age is the same as the member's age.
(5) Payments of taxable distributions made pursuant to this section shall be subject to state and federal income tax
as appropriate.
Section 6. KRS 61.690 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as otherwise provided by this section and KRS 61.705(4), all retirement allowances and other
benefits accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of KRS 61.510 to 61.705, 16.505 to
16.652, and 78.510 to 78.852, and the accumulated account balance and cash securities in the funds
created under KRS 61.510 to 61.705, 16.505 to 16.652, and 78.510 to 78.852, are hereby exempt from
any state, county, or municipal tax, and shall not be subject to execution, attachment, garnishment, or
any other process, and shall not be assigned.

CHAPTER 18 15
(b) A recipient or their legal representative may direct that the recipient's retirement benefits be paid to a
trust that permits the recipient unrestricted access to the amounts held in the trust or if the trust is for
the sole benefit of the recipient. The recipient's direction is not an assignment or transfer of benefits.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, retirement benefits accrued or accruing to any
person under the provisions of KRS 61.510 to 61.705, 16.505 to 16.652, and 78.510 to 78.852 on or after
January 1, 1998, shall be subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020, to the extent provided in KRS 141.010
and 141.0215.
(3) Qualified domestic relations orders issued by a court or administrative agency shall be honored by the
retirement system if:
(a) The benefits payable pursuant to the order meet the requirements of a qualified domestic relations order
as provided by 26 U.S.C. sec. 414(p). The retirement system shall follow applicable provisions of 26
U.S.C. sec. 414(p) in administering qualified domestic relations orders;
(b) The order meets the requirements established by the retirement system and by subsections (3) to (11) of
this section. The board of trustees of the retirement system shall establish the requirements, procedures,
and forms necessary for the administration of qualified domestic relations orders by promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A; and
(c) The order is on the form established by the retirement system pursuant to the retirement system's
authority provided under paragraph (3)(b) of this subsection.
(4) A qualified domestic relations order shall not:
(a) Require the retirement system to take any action not authorized under state or federal law;
(b) Require the retirement system to provide any benefit, allowance, or other payment not authorized under
state or federal law;
(c) Grant or be construed to grant the alternate payee any separate right, title, or interest in or to any
retirement benefit other than to receive payments from the participant's account in accordance with the
administrative regulations promulgated by the retirement system and as provided by subsections (3) to
(11) of this section; or
(d) Grant any separate interest to any person other than the participant.
(5) Any qualified domestic relations order submitted to the retirement system shall specify the dollar amount or
percentage amount of the participant's benefit to be paid to the alternate payee. In calculating the amount to be
paid to the alternate payee, the court or administrative agency that is responsible for issuing the order shall
follow the requirements set forth in the administrative regulations promulgated by the board of trustees.
Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the board shall not be required to honor a qualified domestic
relations order that does not follow the requirements set forth in the administrative regulations promulgated by
the board of trustees.
(6) If the qualified domestic relations order meets the requirements established by the system and by subsections
(3) to (11) of this section, payments to the alternate payee shall begin under the following conditions:
(a) If the participant is retired and is receiving a monthly retirement allowance, the month following the
date the retirement system receives a qualified domestic relations order that complies with the
administrative regulations promulgated by the retirement system and subsections (3) to (11) of this
section; or
(b) If the participant is not retired, the month of the participant's effective retirement date in which the first
retirement allowance is payable to the participant or the month in which the participant receives a
refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS 61.625.
(7) An alternate payee's benefits and rights under a qualified domestic relations order shall terminate upon the
earlier of:
(a) The death of the participant;
(b) The death of the alternate payee; or
(c) The termination of the participant's benefits under any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652,
61.510 to 61.705, and 78.510 to 78.852.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(8) An alternate payee shall not receive a monthly payment under a qualified domestic relations order if the
participant is not receiving a monthly retirement allowance.
(9) The cost of living adjustment provided to the participant pursuant to KRS 61.691 or 78.5518 shall be divided
between the participant and alternate payee in a qualified domestic relations order as follows:
(a) If the order specifies the alternate payee is to receive a percentage of the participant's benefit, then the
cost of living adjustment shall be divided between the participant and the alternate payee based upon
the percentage of the total benefit each is receiving upon the participant's retirement or upon the date the
order is approved by the retirement system, whichever is later; or
(b) If the order specifies that the alternate payee is to receive a set dollar amount of the participant's benefit,
then the order shall specify that:
1. The cost of living adjustment shall be divided between the participant and the alternate payee
based upon the percentage of the total benefit each is receiving upon the participant's retirement
or upon the date the order is approved by the retirement system, whichever is later; or
2. The alternate payee shall receive no cost of living adjustment.
If the order does not specify the division of the cost of living adjustment as required by this paragraph,
then no cost of living adjustment shall be payable to the alternate payee. If no cost of living adjustment
is provided to the alternate payee, then the participant shall receive the full cost of living adjustment he
or she would have received if the order had not been applied to the participant's account.
(10) Except in cases involving child support payments, the retirement system may charge reasonable and necessary
fees and expenses to the recipient and the alternate payee of a qualified domestic relations order for the
administration of the qualified domestic relations order by the retirement system. All fees and expenses shall
be established by administrative regulations promulgated by the board of trustees of the retirement system. The
qualified domestic relations order shall specify whether the fees and expenses provided by this subsection shall
be paid:
(a) Solely by the participant;
(b) Solely by the alternate payee; or
(c) Equally shared by the participant and alternate payee.
(11) The retirement system shall honor a qualified domestic relations order issued prior to July 15, 2010, if:
(a) The order was on file and approved by the retirement system prior to July 15, 2010. All benefits,
including cost of living adjustments payable to the alternate payee, for orders that meet the
requirements of this paragraph shall not be eliminated or reduced as a result of the provisions of
subsections (3) to (10) of this section and KRS 61.510(27) and 78.510(26); or
(b) The order or an amended version of the order meets the requirements established by this section and the
administrative regulations promulgated by the retirement system. The order shall not apply to benefit
payments issued by the retirement system prior to the date the order was approved by the retirement
system.
Section 7. KRS 78.510 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 78.510 to 78.852, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "System" means the County Employees Retirement System created by KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
(2) "Board" means the board of trustees of the system as provided in KRS 78.782;
(3) "County" means any county, or nonprofit organization created and governed by a county, counties, or elected
county officers, sheriff and his or her employees, county clerk and his or her employees, circuit clerk and his
or her deputies, former circuit clerks or former circuit clerk deputies, or political subdivision or
instrumentality, including school boards, cities, charter county governments, urban-county governments,
consolidated local governments, or unified local governments participating in the system by order appropriate
to its governmental structure, as provided in KRS 78.530, and if the board is willing to accept the agency,
organization, or corporation, the board being hereby granted the authority to determine the eligibility of the
agency to participate;
(4) "School board" means:

CHAPTER 18 17
(a) Any board of education participating in the system by order appropriate to its governmental structure,
as provided in KRS 78.530, and if the board is willing to accept the agency or corporation, the board
being hereby granted the authority to determine the eligibility of the agency to participate; or
(b) A public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590 if the public charter school satisfies the criteria set
by the Internal Revenue Service to participate in a governmental retirement plan;
(5) "Examiner" means the medical examiners as provided in KRS 61.665;
(6) "Employee" means every regular full-time appointed or elective officer or employee of a participating county
and the coroner of a participating county, whether or not he or she qualifies as a regular full-time officer. The
term shall not include persons engaged as independent contractors, seasonal, emergency, temporary, and part-
time workers. In case of any doubt, the board shall determine if a person is an employee within the meaning of
KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
(7) "Employer" means a county, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, the elected officials of a county, or
any authority of the county having the power to appoint or elect an employee to office or employment in the
county;
(8) "Member" means any employee who is included in the membership of the system or any former employee
whose membership has not ceased under KRS 78.535;
(9) "Service" means the total of current service and prior service as defined in this section;
(10) "Current service" means the number of years and months of employment as an employee, on and after July 1,
1958, for which creditable compensation is paid and employee contributions deducted, except as otherwise
provided;
(11) "Prior service" means the number of years and completed months, expressed as a fraction of a year, of
employment as an employee, prior to July 1, 1958, for which creditable compensation was paid. An employee
shall be credited with one (1) month of prior service only in those months he or she received compensation for
at least one hundred (100) hours of work. Twelve (12) months of current service in the system shall be
required to validate prior service;
(12) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and
credited to his or her individual account in the members' account, including employee contributions picked up
after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4), together with interest credited, on the amounts, and any
other amounts the member shall have contributed thereto, including interest credited thereon. "Accumulated
contributions" shall not include employee contributions that are deposited into accounts established pursuant to
26 U.S.C. sec. 401(h) within the fund established in KRS 78.520, as prescribed by KRS 78.5536(3)(b);
(13) "Creditable compensation":
(a) Except as limited by paragraph (c) of this subsection, means all salary, wages, and fees, including
payments for compensatory time, paid to the employee as a result of services performed for the
employer or for time during which the member is on paid leave, which are includable on the member's
federal form W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips, other compensation",
including employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4). The
creditable compensation of fee officers who receive salary, fees, maintenance, or other perquisites as a
result of their official duties is the gross amount received decreased by the cost of salary paid deputies
and clerks and the cost of office supplies and other official expenses;
(b) Includes:
1. Lump-sum bonuses, severance pay, or employer-provided payments for purchase of service
credit, which shall be averaged over the employee's service with the system in which it is
recorded if it is equal to or greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
2. Cases where compensation includes maintenance and other perquisites, but the board shall fix
the value of that part of the compensation not paid in money;
3. Lump-sum payments for creditable compensation paid as a result of an order of a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or
for any creditable compensation paid in anticipation of settlement of an action before a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
including notices of violations of state or federal wage and hour statutes or violations of state or
federal discrimination statutes, which shall be credited to the fiscal year during which the wages
were earned or should have been paid by the employer. This subparagraph shall also include
lump-sum payments for reinstated wages pursuant to KRS 61.569, which shall be credited to the
period during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer;
4. Amounts which are not includable in the member's gross income by virtue of the member having
taken a voluntary salary reduction provided for under applicable provisions of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
5. Elective amounts for qualified transportation fringes paid or made available on or after January
1, 2001, for calendar years on or after January 1, 2001, that are not includable in the gross
income of the employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. sec. 132(f)(4); and
(c) Excludes:
1. Living allowances, expense reimbursements, lump-sum payments for accrued vacation leave,
sick leave except as provided in KRS 78.616(5), and other items determined by the board;
2. For employees who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008, lump-sum payments for
compensatory time;
3. Training incentive payments for city officers paid as set out in KRS 64.5277 to 64.5279;
4. For employees who begin participating on or after August 1, 2016, nominal fees paid for services
as a volunteer; and
5. Any salary or wages paid to an employee for services as a Kentucky State Police school resource
officer as defined by KRS 158.441;
(14) "Final compensation" means:
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is employed in a nonhazardous
position, the creditable compensation of the member during the five (5) fiscal years he or she was paid
at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit during that five
(5) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The five (5) years may be fractional and need not be
consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the five (5) year period is less than forty-
eight (48), one (1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(b) For a member who is employed in a nonhazardous position, whose effective retirement date is between
August 1, 2001, and January 1, 2009, and whose total service credit is at least twenty-seven (27) years
and whose age and years of service total at least seventy-five (75), final compensation means the
creditable compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years the member was paid at the
highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit during that three (3)
year period multiplied by twelve (12). The three (3) years may be fractional and need not be
consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3) year period is less than
twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(c) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is employed in a hazardous
position, as provided in KRS 78.5520, the creditable compensation of the member during the three (3)
fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of
service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The three (3) years may be
fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3)
year period is less than twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may contain less
than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be used;
(d) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014,
who is employed in a nonhazardous position, the creditable compensation of the member during the
five (5) complete fiscal years immediately preceding retirement divided by five (5). Each fiscal year
used to determine final compensation must contain twelve (12) months of service credit. If the member
does not have five (5) complete fiscal years that each contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then
one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may contain less than twelve (12) months of service
credit, shall be added until the number of months in the final compensation calculation is at least sixty
(60) months; or

CHAPTER 18 19
(e) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014,
who is employed in a hazardous position as provided in KRS 78.5520, the creditable compensation of
the member during the three (3) complete fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly
rate divided by three (3). Each fiscal year used to determine final compensation must contain twelve
(12) months of service credit. If the member does not have three (3) complete fiscal years that each
contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may
contain less than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be added until the number of months in the
final compensation calculation is at least thirty-six (36) months;
(15) "Final rate of pay" means the actual rate upon which earnings of an employee were calculated during the
twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the member's effective retirement date, and shall include
employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4). The rate shall be certified
to the system by the employer and the following equivalents shall be used to convert the rate to an annual rate:
two thousand eighty (2,080) hours for eight (8) hour workdays, one thousand nine hundred fifty (1,950) hours
for seven and one-half (7.5) hour workdays, two hundred sixty (260) days, fifty-two (52) weeks, twelve (12)
months, one (1) year;
(16) "Retirement allowance" means the retirement payments to which a member is entitled;
(17) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of the actuarial tables
adopted by the board. In cases of disability retirement, the options authorized by KRS 61.635 shall be
computed by adding ten (10) years to the age of the member, unless the member has chosen the Social
Security adjustment option as provided for in KRS 61.635(8), in which case the member's actual age shall be
used. For members who begin participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, no disability retirement
option shall be less than the same option computed under early retirement;
(18) "Normal retirement date", unless otherwise provided in KRS 78.510 to 78.852, means:
(a) For a member with service in a nonhazardous position, the sixty-fifth birthday of a member;
(b) For a member with service in a hazardous position who begins participating before September 1, 2008,
the first day of the month following a member's fifty-fifth birthday; or
(c) For a member with service in a hazardous position who begins participating on or after September 1,
2008, the first day of the month following a member's sixtieth birthday;
(19) "Fiscal year" of the system means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the following June 30, which
shall also be the plan year. The "fiscal year" shall be the limitation year used to determine contribution and
benefits limits as set out in 26 U.S.C. sec. 415;
(20) "Agency reporting official" means the person designated by the participating employer who shall be
responsible for forwarding all employer and employee contributions and a record of the contributions to the
system and for performing other administrative duties pursuant to KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
(21) "Regular full-time positions," as used in subsection (6) of this section, shall mean all positions that average
one hundred (100) or more hours per month, determined by using the number of hours actually worked in a
calendar or fiscal year, or eighty (80) or more hours per month in the case of noncertified employees of school
boards, determined by using the number of hours actually worked in a calendar or school year, unless
otherwise specified, except:
(a) Seasonal positions, which although temporary in duration, are positions which coincide in duration with
a particular season or seasons of the year and that may recur regularly from year to year, in which case
the period of time shall not exceed nine (9) months, except for employees of school boards, in which
case the period of time shall not exceed six (6) months;
(b) Emergency positions which are positions utilized by the employer during:
1. An emergency as determined by the employer for a period not exceeding thirty (30) working
days and are nonrenewable; or
2. A state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or the Governor of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky that are created or filled specifically for addressing the employer's
needs during and as a result of the declared emergency;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Temporary positions that are positions of employment with a participating agency for a period of time
not to exceed twelve (12) months and not renewable;
(d) Probationary positions which are positions of employment with a participating employer that do not
exceed twelve (12) months and that are used uniformly by the participating agency on new employees
who would otherwise be eligible for participation in the system. Probationary positions shall not be
renewable by the participating employer for the same employee, unless the employee has not been
employed with the participating employer for a period of at least twelve (12) months; or
(e) Part-time positions that are positions that may be permanent in duration, but that require less than a
calendar or fiscal year average of one hundred (100) hours of work per month, determined by using the
number of months actually worked within a calendar or fiscal year, in the performance of duty, except
in case of noncertified employees of school boards, the school term average shall be eighty (80) hours
of work per month, determined by using the number of months actually worked in a calendar or school
year, in the performance of duty;
(22) "Alternate participation plan" means a method of participation in the system as provided for by KRS
78.530(3);
(23) "Retired member" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance or any former member who has
on file at the retirement office the necessary documents for retirement benefits and is no longer contributing to
the system;
(24) "Current rate of pay" means the member's actual hourly, daily, weekly, biweekly, monthly, or yearly rate of
pay converted to an annual rate as defined in final rate of pay. The rate shall be certified by the employer;
(25) "Beneficiary" means the person, persons, estate, trust, special needs trust, or trustee designated by the member
in accordance with KRS 61.542 or 61.705 to receive any available benefits in the event of the member's death.
As used in KRS 78.5536, beneficiary shall not mean an estate, trust, or trustee;
(26) "Recipient" means the retired member, the person or persons designated as beneficiary by the member and
drawing a retirement allowance as a result of the member's death, or a dependent child drawing a retirement
allowance. An alternate payee of a qualified domestic relations order shall not be considered a recipient,
except for purposes of KRS 61.623;
(27) "Person" means a natural person;
(28) "School term or year" means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the following June 30;
(29) "Retirement office" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority office building in Frankfort, unless
otherwise designated by the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority;
(30) "Vested" for purposes of determining eligibility for purchasing service credit under KRS 61.552 means the
employee has at least forty-eight (48) months of service if age sixty-five (65) or older or at least sixty (60)
months of service if under the age of sixty-five (65). For purposes of this subsection, "service" means service
in the systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems and County Employees Retirement System;
(31) "Participating" means an employee is currently earning service credit in the system as provided in KRS
78.615;
(32) "Month" means a calendar month;
(33) "Membership date" means the date upon which the member began participating in the system as provided in
KRS 78.615;
(34) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (8) of this section, or a retired member, as defined by
subsection (23) of this section;
(35) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property
settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital property rights to an alternate
payee;
(36) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant, who is designated
to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic relations order;

CHAPTER 18 21
(37) "Accumulated employer credit" means the employer pay credit deposited to the member's account and interest
credited on such amounts as provided by KRS 78.5512 and 78.5516;
(38) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, the member's accumulated
contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid cash
balance plan as provided by KRS 78.5512 and 78.5516, the combined sum of the member's
accumulated contributions and the member's accumulated employer credit;
(39) "Volunteer" means an individual who:
(a) Freely and without pressure or coercion performs hours of service for an employer participating in one
(1) of the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or the County Employees Retirement
System without receipt of compensation for services rendered, except for reimbursement of actual
expenses, payment of a nominal fee to offset the costs of performing the voluntary services, or both;
and
(b) If a retired member, does not become an employee, leased employee, or independent contractor of the
employer for which he or she is performing volunteer services for a period of at least twelve (12)
months following the retired member's most recent retirement date;
(40) "Nominal fee" means compensation earned for services as a volunteer that does not exceed five hundred
dollars ($500) per month with each participating employer. Compensation earned for services as a volunteer
from more than one (1) participating employer during a month shall not be aggregated to determine whether
the compensation exceeds the five hundred dollars ($500) per month maximum provided by this subsection;
(41) "Nonhazardous position" means a position that does not meet the requirements of KRS 78.5520 or has not
been approved by the board as a hazardous position;
(42) "Hazardous position" means a position that meets the requirements of KRS 78.5520 and has been approved by
the board as hazardous;
(43) "Level-percentage-of-payroll amortization method" means a method of determining the annual amortization
payment on the unfunded actuarial accrued liability as expressed as a percentage of payroll over a set period of
years. Under this method, the percentage of payroll shall be projected to remain constant for all years
remaining in the set period and the unfunded actuarially accrued liability shall be projected to be fully
amortized at the conclusion of the set period;
(44) "Increment" means twelve (12) months of service credit which are purchased. The twelve (12) months need
not be consecutive. The final increment may be less than twelve (12) months;
(45) "Last day of paid employment" means the last date employer and employee contributions are required to be
reported in accordance with KRS 16.543, 61.543, or 78.615 to the retirement office in order for the employee
to receive current service credit for the month. Last day of paid employment does not mean a date the
employee receives payment for accrued leave, whether by lump sum or otherwise, if that date occurs twenty-
four (24) or more months after previous contributions;
(46) "Objective medical evidence" means reports of examinations or treatments; medical signs which are
anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that can be observed; psychiatric signs which are
medically demonstrable phenomena indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory,
orientation, or contact with reality; or laboratory findings which are anatomical, physiological, or
psychological phenomena that can be shown by medically acceptable laboratory diagnostic techniques,
including but not limited to chemical tests, electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and
psychological tests;
(47) "Hazardous disability" as used in KRS 78.510 to 78.852 means a disability which results in an employee's total
incapacity to continue as an employee in a hazardous position, but the employee is not necessarily deemed to
be totally and permanently disabled to engage in other occupations for remuneration or profit;
(48) "Act in line of duty" means, for employees in hazardous positions under KRS 78.5520:
(a) A single act occurring which was required in the performance of the principal duties of the hazardous
position as defined by the job description; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) A single act of violence committed against the employee that is found to be related to his or her job
duties, whether or not it occurs at his or her job site;
(49) "Dependent child" means a child in the womb and a natural or legally adopted child of the member who has
neither attained age eighteen (18) nor married or who is an unmarried full-time student who has not attained
age twenty-two (22). Solely in the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as
defined in this section, dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, becomes totally and
permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in the line of duty as defined in this section, or becomes
disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided
by KRS 61.621(5)(a), "dependent child" also means a naturally or legally adopted disabled child of the
member, regardless of the child's age, if the child has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security
disability benefits or is being claimed as a qualifying child for tax purposes due to the child's total and
permanent disability;
(50) "Normal retirement age" means the age at which the member meets the requirements for his or her normal
retirement date as provided by subsection (18) of this section;
(51) "Disability retirement date" means the first day of the month following the last day of paid employment;
(52) "Monthly average pay" means:
(a) In the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or
who dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621, the higher of the member's
monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the deceased
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment; or
(b) In the case where a member becomes totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in line
of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in
KRS 61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the higher of the member's
monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the disabled
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment prior to the date the act in line of duty
or duty-related injury occurred;
(53) "Authority" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority as provided by KRS 61.505;
(54) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority;[ and]
(55) "Gainful employment" means work in any capacity that is or may be performed with regularity and is or may
be usually done for pay, whether pay is received or not received, including seasonal, volunteer, part-time, and
on-call work; and
(56) "Special needs trust" means a trust described in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A) or (C) for the benefit of one
(1) person. Any reference to a trust includes a special needs trust, unless the context otherwise requires.
Section 8. KRS 78.5532 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a member dies prior to the first day of the month in which the member would have received his or her first
retirement allowance, the member's beneficiary shall be eligible for the benefits provided by this section if the
member had on file a written designation of a beneficiary with the retirement office as provided by KRS
61.542 and the member met the following conditions at the date of his or her death:
(a) 1. The member had service in a nonhazardous position and was eligible to retire under KRS
78.5510(2) or (3) or 78.5512(6); or
2. The member had service in a hazardous position and was eligible to retire under KRS 78.5514(2)
or (3) or 78.5516(6);
(b) The member was in active employment or on authorized leave of absence with five (5) or more years of
service credit and died prior to his or her normal retirement date or in the case of a nonhazardous
member, was normal retirement age or older and had at least four (4) years of service credit; or
(c) The member was not in active employment or on authorized leave of absence with twelve (12) or more
years of service credit and died prior to his or her normal retirement date.
(2) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section is a single person or a
special needs trust, then the beneficiary may elect to receive:

CHAPTER 18 23
(a) A monthly benefit payable for the life of the beneficiary or the life of the beneficiary of the special
needs trust that is equal to the benefit that would have been paid had the member retired immediately
prior to his or her date of death and elected to receive benefits payable under the survivorship one
hundred percent (100%) option as provided in KRS 61.635(2);
(b) A monthly benefit payable for the life of the beneficiary or the life of the beneficiary of the special
needs trust under the beneficiary Social Security adjustment option as provided in KRS 61.635(9) that
is the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) A monthly benefit payable for a period of sixty (60) months that is the actuarial equivalent to the
amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(d) A monthly benefit payable for a period of one hundred twenty (120) months that is the actuarial
equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(e) If the member began participating prior to January 1, 2014, a monthly benefit payable for a period of
one hundred twenty (120) months that is equivalent to the benefit the member would have been entitled
to receive based on his or her years of service and final compensation at the date of his or her death
reduced by the survivorship fifty percent (50%) factor as provided for in KRS 61.635(4), then reduced
by fifty percent (50%), and that is the actuarial equivalent to the amount computed under paragraph (a)
of this subsection; or
(f) The higher of a refund of the member's accumulated account balance as described in KRS 61.625(1) or
one (1) time lump-sum payment which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the amount payable under
paragraph (a) of this subsection for a period of sixty (60) months.
(3) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided by subsection (1) of this section is multiple beneficiaries or a
trust, other than a special needs trust, then the multiple beneficiaries by consensus or the trustee may elect to
receive the actuarial equivalent amounts payable under subsection (2)(c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section using
the assumption that the beneficiary's age is the same as the member's age.
(4) If the beneficiary eligible for benefits as provided in subsection (1) of this section is the member's estate, then
the beneficiary shall receive the higher of a refund of the member's accumulated account balance as described
in KRS 61.625(1) or the one (1) time lump-sum payment payable under subsection (2)(f) of this section, using
the assumption that the beneficiary's age is the same as the member's age.
(5) Payments of taxable distributions made pursuant to this section shall be subject to state and federal income tax
as appropriate.
(6) (a) The beneficiary of a member with service in a nonhazardous position who dies as a result of a duty-
related injury may be eligible for benefits based upon the definitions, criteria, and benefits specified by
KRS 61.621.
(b) The beneficiary of a member with service in a hazardous position who dies as a direct result of an act in
line of duty may be eligible for benefits from the system based upon the definitions, criteria, and
benefits specified by KRS 78.5534.
Section 9. KRS 161.525 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon death of a member in active contributing status at the time of death, who was eligible to retire by reason
of service, the spouse, if named as the primary beneficiary of the member's retirement account, or in the
absence of an eligible spouse a legal dependent of the member, if named as the primary beneficiary, shall be
entitled to elect, in lieu of a refund of the member's accumulated account balance or benefits provided in KRS
161.520, an annuity actuarially equivalent at the attained age of the beneficiary to the annuity that would have
been paid to the deceased member had retirement been effective on the day immediately preceding the
member's death. Under the provisions of KRS 61.680, benefits shall be processed as if the member retired for
service. In exercising this right the spouse or legal dependent shall be limited to selecting an option providing
either a straight life annuity with refundable balance or a term certain option. A spouse may receive the
annuity provided by this section at the same time as children are qualifying for survivors' benefits under the
provisions of KRS 161.520; however, a legal dependent, other than a spouse, may not receive these payments
if children have qualified for benefits under that section.
(2) A spouse qualifying for an annuity under subsection (1) of this section may defer the payments in order to
reduce the actuarial discounts to be applied due to age.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) Upon death of a member in active contributing status at the time of his or her death, who had a minimum of
twenty-seven (27) years of service, the spouse, if named as the primary beneficiary of the member's account
shall be entitled to a monthly minimum allowance of three hundred dollars ($300) as the basic straight life
annuity. This provision applies to surviving spouses of members who were receiving benefit payments under
KRS 161.520 as of June 30, 1986, and to surviving spouses of members who die on or after July 1, 1986.
(4) If the surviving spouse or legal dependent eligible for a benefit under subsection (1) of this section is the
sole beneficiary of a special needs trust, the annuity payments made under subsection (1) of this section
shall be made payable to the special needs trust.
Section 10. KRS 161.640 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Retirement annuities shall be payable monthly. The first payment to an annuitant shall be made at the payment
date at the end of one (1) full payment period after his retirement and shall consist of one (1) regular monthly
payment. Retirement for a member receiving one (1) full year of service credit during a fiscal year shall be no
earlier than July 1 next following the end of such fiscal year. Notwithstanding any other statutory provisions to
the contrary, members filling positions that customarily require twelve (12) months of service during a fiscal
year cannot retire prior to July 1 without a corresponding pro rata reduction in salary and service credit. The
board of trustees may determine which positions customarily require twelve (12) months of service during a
fiscal year.
(2) The board of trustees may enter into agreements with retired members for payroll deductions when it is
deemed in the best interest of the retired members and the retirement system.
(3) (a) All new retirees, on or after July 1, 1998, shall receive their monthly annuity checks by electronic fund
transfer. All retiree, beneficiary, and survivor monthly allowance payments, except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, shall be made by electronic fund transfer. Except as
provided in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, all monthly payments shall be made payable only to
an account solely in the name of the retiree, beneficiary, or survivor as an individual and natural person,
or to a joint account in the name of the retiree, beneficiary, or survivor as an individual and natural
person and another individual and natural person.
(b) If the retiree, beneficiary, or survivor is a resident of a nursing or assisted-care home, monthly payments
may be made to the order of the nursing or assisted-care home for the benefit of the retiree, beneficiary,
or survivor by including the retiree's, beneficiary's, or survivor's name. Monthly annuity checks so paid
to a nursing or assisted-care home may be sent by mail rather than electronic fund transfer.
(c) If the retiree, beneficiary, or survivor is the sole beneficiary of a special needs trust:
1. Monthly payments shall be made to the order of the special needs trust, and checks may be
sent by mail to the special needs trust for the benefit of the retiree, beneficiary, or survivor;
2. Upon the death of the retiree, beneficiary, or survivor of a special needs trust, the trustee of
that trust shall notify the Teachers' Retirement System;
3. Any payments made to a special needs trust that are not properly payable to the special needs
trust shall be returned to the Teachers' Retirement System and shall not be subject to claims
for reimbursement from any state for Medicaid benefits paid on behalf of the beneficiary
under any Medicaid payback provision, and any overpayments of retirement allowance
received by the special needs trust shall be repaid to the Teachers' Retirement System; and
4. The Teachers' Retirement System may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this paragraph.
Section 11. KRS 161.700 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this section and KRS 161.655(5), the right of a member to a retirement
allowance and to the return of contributions, any benefit or right accrued or accruing to any person under KRS
161.220 to 161.716, and the money in the various funds established pursuant to KRS 161.220 to 161.716 are
hereby exempt from any state or municipal tax, and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment,
or other process, and shall not be assigned.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, retirement allowances and other benefits
accrued or accruing under KRS 161.220 to 161.716 to a person who is the beneficiary of a special needs
trust may be assigned to the trustee of that special needs trust. Any retirement allowances or other benefits
assigned to a special needs trust under this subsection, or accrued or accruing under KRS 161.220 to

CHAPTER 18 25
161.716 to a person who is the beneficiary of a special needs trust, shall cease upon the death of the
beneficiary of the special needs trust and shall not be subject to state reimbursement for Medicaid benefits
paid on behalf of the beneficiary under a Medicaid payback provision.
(3)[(2)] Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, retirement benefits accrued or accruing to any person
under this retirement system on or after January 1, 1998, shall be subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020,
to the extent provided in KRS 141.010 and 141.0215.
(4)[(3)] Retirement allowance, disability allowance, accumulated account balance, or any other benefit under
the retirement system shall not be classified as marital property pursuant to KRS 403.190(1), except to the
extent permitted under KRS 403.190(4). Retirement allowance, disability allowance, accumulated
contributions, or any other benefit under the retirement system shall not be considered as an economic
circumstance during the division of marital property in an action for dissolution of marriage pursuant to KRS
403.190(1)(d), except to the extent permitted under KRS 403.190(4).
(5)[(4)] Qualified domestic relations orders issued by a court or administrative agency shall be honored by the
retirement system if:
(a) The benefits payable pursuant to the order meet the requirements of a qualified domestic relations order
as provided by 26 U.S.C. sec. 414(p). The retirement system shall follow applicable provisions of 26
U.S.C. sec. 414(p) in administering qualified domestic relations orders;
(b) The order meets the requirements established by the retirement system and by subsections (5)[(4)] to
(13)[(12)] of this section. The board of trustees of the retirement system shall establish the
requirements, procedures, and forms necessary for the administration of qualified domestic relations
order by promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A; and
(c) The order is on the form established by the retirement system pursuant to the retirement system's
authority provided under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(6)[(5)] A qualified domestic relations order shall not:
(a) Require the retirement system to take any action not authorized under state or federal law;
(b) Require the retirement system to provide any benefit, allowance, or other payment not authorized under
state or federal law;
(c) Grant or be construed to grant the alternate payee any separate right, title, or interest in or to any
retirement benefit other than to receive payments from the participant's account in accordance with the
administrative regulations promulgated by the system and as provided by subsections (5)[(4)] to
(13)[(12)] of this section; or
(d) Grant any separate interest to any person other than the participant.
(7)[(6)] Any qualified domestic relations order submitted to the retirement system shall specify the dollar
amount or percentage amount of the participant's benefit to be paid to the alternate payee. In calculating the
amount to be paid to the alternate payee, the court or administrative agency that is responsible for issuing the
order shall follow the requirements set forth in the administrative regulations promulgated by the board of
trustees. Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the board shall not be required to honor a qualified
domestic relations order that does not follow the requirements set forth in the administrative regulations
promulgated by the board of trustees.
(8)[(7)] If the qualified domestic relations order meets the requirements established by the system and by
subsections (5)[(4)] to (13)[(12)] of this section, payments to the alternate payee shall be distributed under the
following conditions:
(a) If the participant is retired and is receiving a monthly retirement allowance, the month following the
date the retirement system receives a qualified domestic relations order that complies with the
administrative regulations promulgated by the retirement system and subsections (5)[(4)] to (13)[(12)]
of this section; or
(b) If the participant is not retired, the month of the participant's effective retirement date in which the first
retirement allowance is payable to the participant or the month in which the participant receives a
refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS 161.470(6).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(9)[(8)] An alternate payee's benefits and rights under a qualified domestic relations order shall terminate upon
the earlier of:
(a) The death of the participant;
(b) The death of the alternate payee; or
(c) The termination of benefits to the participant under any provision of KRS 161.220 to 161.716.
(10)[(9)] An alternate payee shall not receive a monthly payment under a qualified domestic relations order if the
participant is not receiving a monthly retirement allowance.
(11)[(10)] The cost of living adjustment provided to the participant pursuant to KRS 161.620 shall be divided
between the participant and alternate payee in a qualified domestic relations order as follows:
(a) If the order specifies the alternate payee is to receive a percentage of the participant's benefit, then the
cost of living adjustment shall be divided between the participant and the alternate payee based upon
the percentage of the total benefit each is receiving upon the participant's retirement or upon the date the
order is approved by the retirement system, whichever is later; or
(b) If the order specifies that the alternate payee is to receive a set dollar amount of the participant's benefit,
then the order shall specify that:
1. The cost of living adjustment shall be divided between the participant and the alternate payee
based upon the percentage of the total benefit each is receiving upon the participant's retirement
or upon the date the order is approved by the retirement system, whichever is later; or
2. The alternate payee shall receive no cost of living adjustment.
If the order does not specify the division of the cost of living adjustment as required by this paragraph,
then no cost of living adjustment shall be payable to the alternate payee. If no cost of living adjustment
is provided to the alternate payee, then the participant shall receive the full cost of living adjustment he
or she would have received if the order had not been applied to the participant's account.
(12)[(11)] Except in cases involving child support payments, the retirement system may charge reasonable and
necessary fees and expenses to the recipient and the alternate payee of a qualified domestic relations order for
the administration of the qualified domestic relations order by retirement system. All fees and expenses shall
be established by the administrative regulations promulgated by the board of trustees of the retirement system.
The qualified domestic relations order shall specify whether the fees and expenses provided by this subsection
shall be paid:
(a) Solely by the participant;
(b) Solely by the alternate payee; or
(c) Equally shared by the participant and alternate payee.
(13)[(12)] The retirement system shall honor a qualified domestic relations order issued prior to July 15, 2010, for
prospective benefit payments if the order or an amended version of the order meets the requirements
established by this section and the administrative regulations promulgated by the retirement system. The order
shall not apply to benefit payments issued by the retirement system prior to the date the order was approved by
the retirement system.
Section 12. KRS 21.420 is amended to read as follows:
(1) After the death of a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014,
who at the time of his or her death was receiving a service retirement allowance (other than an actuarially
reduced allowance under subsection (3) of KRS 21.400), or was receiving a disability retirement allowance,
his or her surviving spouse is entitled to receive during his or her lifetime a monthly allowance equal to one-
half (1/2) of that he or she was receiving.
(2) (a) If a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, dies
before retirement and before reaching normal retirement age, without regard to length of service, his or
her surviving spouse is entitled to receive during his or her lifetime a monthly allowance equal to one-
half (1/2) of the monthly allowance the member would have received commencing at his or her normal
retirement date if he or she had continued in service until that date and had then retired, computed
however on the basis of his or her final compensation at time of death.

CHAPTER 18 27
(b) If a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, dies
before retirement and after reaching normal retirement age, his or her surviving spouse is entitled to
receive during his or her lifetime a monthly allowance equal to one-half (1/2) of the monthly allowance
the member would have been entitled to, on the basis of his or her years of service, had he or she
retired on the date of his death.
(3) If a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, dies after
retirement and was at the time of his or her death receiving an actuarially reduced allowance under subsection
(3) of KRS 21.400, or was not at the time of his or her death receiving a retirement allowance but had
acquired the vested right under subsection (2) of KRS 21.400 to have received an allowance upon reaching
normal retirement age, his or her surviving spouse is entitled to receive during his or her lifetime a monthly
allowance equal to one-half (1/2) of the monthly allowance the member would have received when he or she
reached normal retirement age.
(4) A member, or a retiree who began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, who has not commenced
drawing retirement benefits pursuant to KRS 21.400, and who dies without a spouse or eligible children
entitled to survivor's benefits, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the accumulated contributions of
the member. A member, or a retiree who began participating in the plan on or after January 1, 2014, who has
not commenced drawing retirement benefits pursuant to KRS 21.402, who dies without a spouse or eligible
children entitled to survivor's benefits, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the accumulated account
balance of the member. A trust, including a special needs trust, may be designated as a beneficiary. Absent a
designation by the member or retiree, the accumulated contributions or accumulated account balance, as
applicable based upon the member's participation date, shall be paid to the member's estate.
(5) A member who began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, who commences drawing retirement
benefits pursuant to KRS 21.400 or 21.410, and who dies without a spouse or eligible children entitled to
survivor's benefits and before the benefits received by the member equal the accumulated contributions of the
member, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the balance of the accumulated contributions of the
member. A member who began participating in the plan on or after January 1, 2014, who commences drawing
retirement benefits pursuant to KRS 21.402 or 21.410, and who dies without a spouse or eligible children
entitled to survivor's benefits and before the benefits received by the member equal the accumulated account
balance of the member, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the balance of the accumulated account
balance of the member. A trust, including a special needs trust, may be designated as a beneficiary. Any
benefits received shall be deducted from the accumulated contributions or accumulated account balance.
Absent a designation by the member, the balance of the accumulated contributions or accumulated account
balance, as applicable based upon the member's participation date, shall be paid to the member's estate.
(6) A member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may designate a
beneficiary who shall receive the balance of the accumulated contributions of the member, in the event
survivor's benefits are being paid pursuant to subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, and the survivor dies
prior to receiving benefits equal to the member's contributions. In this event, the provisions of subsection (5)
of this section shall apply as to offset and payment.
(7) A member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may, prior to the
drawing of benefits, elect in writing to the executive secretary of the Judicial Form Retirement System, to take
an optional retirement allowance which shall be actuarially equivalent to the amount of retirement allowance
otherwise payable to the member and the member's spouse. If the member dies after retirement, the option
chosen shall prevail over the provisions of subsections (1) and (3) of this section. If the member dies prior to
retirement, the option chosen shall prevail over the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. The options
shall include:
(a) Survivorship one hundred percent (100%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement
allowance during the member's lifetime and have the retirement allowance continued after death to the
spouse during the lifetime of the spouse.
(b) Survivorship sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%). The member may elect to receive a decreased
retirement allowance during the member's lifetime and have two-thirds (2/3) of the retirement
allowance continue after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse.
If a retiree, living or deceased, chose either of the optional retirement benefit allowances specified in
paragraphs (a) or (b) of this subsection from July 15, 1994, to July 15, 1998, the optional allowance shall be
adjusted accordingly, and the new benefit shall commence August 1, 1998. Each recipient of benefits from the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
plan, who retired from July 15, 1994, to July 15, 1998, shall have a one-time opportunity to select an optional
retirement allowance. The election by the recipient shall be prior to August 1, 1998, at which time the new
benefit shall commence. The option chosen shall prevail, subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section
notwithstanding.
(8) For a member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014:
(a) If the member dies prior to drawing a retirement allowance, then the surviving spouse may elect to:
1. Take a refund of the member's accumulated account balance or accumulated contributions as
provided by KRS 21.402; or
2. If the member had at least five (5) years of service in the plan at the time of his or her death, have
the member's accumulated account balance annuitized into a monthly benefit payable for life that
is equal to the benefit that would have been paid had the member retired immediately prior to his
or her date of death and elected to receive benefits payable under the survivorship one hundred
percent (100%) option as provided by paragraph (b)1. of this subsection.
In lieu of the benefits provided by this paragraph to the surviving spouse, the member may elect to have
the benefits payable under this paragraph paid to an individual dependent child by completing the forms
provided prescribed by the Judicial Form Retirement System. If no surviving spouse or dependent
children are eligible to receive benefits, then the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply
to the member.
(b) If a member dies on or after the date the member begins drawing a retirement allowance, the benefits
payable to the surviving spouse shall be based upon whether or not the member elects prior to
retirement to receive an optional retirement allowance. The election shall be in writing on the forms
prescribed by the Judicial Form Retirement System and shall be actuarially equivalent to the amount of
retirement allowance otherwise payable to the member. The optional retirement allowances shall
include:
1. Survivorship one hundred percent (100%). The member may elect to receive a decreased
retirement allowance during the member's lifetime and have the retirement allowance continued
after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse;
2. Survivorship sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%). The member may elect to receive a
decreased retirement allowance during the member's lifetime and have two-thirds (2/3) of the
retirement allowance continue after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse; or
3. Survivorship fifty percent (50%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement
allowance during the member's lifetime and have one-half (1/2) of the retirement allowance
continue after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse.
In lieu of the benefits provided by this paragraph to the surviving spouse, the member may elect prior to
retirement to have the benefits payable under this paragraph paid to an individual dependent child or to
a special needs trust by completing the forms provided by the Judicial Form Retirement System. If no
surviving spouse or dependent children are eligible to receive benefits, then the provisions of subsection
(5) of this section shall apply to the member.
(c) For purposes of this section a "dependent child" shall mean a child who is less than twenty-one (21)
years of age or a disabled child who is eligible for Social Security disability benefits.
(9) (a) As used in this section, "special needs trust" means a trust described in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A)
or (C).
(b) In any circumstances in which a surviving spouse would be entitled to any allowance under this
section, the monthly allowance that the surviving spouse was receiving or is entitled to receive may be
paid to a special needs trust for the benefit of the surviving spouse.
Section 13. KRS 21.425 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In any circumstances in which a surviving spouse would be entitled to any allowance under KRS 21.420, but
there is no surviving spouse or the surviving spouse subsequently dies, and there is a surviving child or
children of the member under the age of twenty-one (21), or there is a disabled child or children, the monthly
allowance that the surviving spouse would have received or was receiving shall be continued, as follows:

CHAPTER 18 29
(a) If the member does not have a disabled child or children, the benefit shall continue until there are no
children remaining under the age of twenty-one (21); or
(b) If the member has a disabled child or children, the benefit shall continue until the death of the last
remaining disabled child.
(2) A member may designate his or her child or children under the age of twenty-one (21), or his or her disabled
child or children, or a special needs trust as defined by subsection (9) of Section 12 of this Act for the benefit
of the disabled child, to receive the death benefit payable under KRS 21.420 instead of his or her spouse, or
he or she may designate that his or her spouse shall receive a percentage of the death benefit, and his or her
child or children under the age of twenty-one (21), or his or her disabled child or children, or a special needs
trust as defined by subsection (9) of Section 12 of this Act for the benefit of a disabled child, shall receive
the remainder. The member making such a choice shall designate his or her beneficiary or beneficiaries in
writing to the manager of the Judicial Form Retirement System on a form provided by the manager.
(3) For purposes of this section, "disabled" means an individual determined by the Social Security Administration
to be entitled to total disability benefits.
(4) Subsections (1) to (3) of this section shall not apply to a member who begins participating in the Judicial
Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014.
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version